Maryland, session 2026, HB1536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
SUBTITLE 27. INJURY CAUSED BY VOLUNTARY IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT
COOPERATION.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1536*

HOUSE BILL 1536
3–2701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AID IN IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT” MEANS:
(1) PROVIDING ACCESS TO AN AREA THAT WOULD OTHERWISE
REQUIRE A JUDICIAL WARRANT FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT TO ACCESS;
(2) SHARING PERSONAL INFORMATION OF ANOTHER WITH
IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES; OR
(3) DELAYING THE DEPARTURE OF OR DETAINING ANOTHER BY
FORCE OR DECEIT WITH THE INTENT TO MAKE THE INDIVIDUAL ACCESSIBLE TO
IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES.
(C) (1) “JUDICIAL WARRANT” MEANS A WARRANT SIGNED BY A JUDGE,
MAGISTRATE, OR DISTRICT COURT COMMISSIONER OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION.
(2) “JUDICIAL WARRANT” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN ADMINISTRATIVE
WARRANT, INCLUDING AN IMMIGRATION AND CUSTOMS ENFORCEMENT FORM
I–200 OR FORM I–205.
(D) “LICENSE” MEANS AN OCCUPATIONAL OR PROFESSIONAL LICENSE
ISSUED TO AN INDIVIDUAL BY THE STATE, INCLUDING A LICENSE ISSUED UNDER
THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS ARTICLE, THE BUSINESS
REGULATION ARTICLE, AND THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE.
(E) “LICENSING AUTHORITY” MEANS A STATE ENTITY THAT ISSUES A
LICENSE TO AN INDIVIDUAL.
(F) “PERSON” INCLUDES:
(1) THE STATE;
(2) A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT;
(3) A COUNTY SHERIFF; AND
(4) ANY AGENCY, OFFICER, EMPLOYEE, CONTRACTOR, OR AGENT OF
THE STATE OR A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT.

HOUSE BILL 1536 3
3–2702.
(A) EXCEPT AS REQUIRED BY JUDICIAL WARRANT OR STATE OR FEDERAL
LAW, A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY AID IN IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT IN A
MANNER THAT VIOLATES THE CONSTITUTIONAL RIGHTS OF ANOTHER.
(B) FOR EVERY INTERACTION WITH IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT, A
PERSON SHALL:
(1) DOCUMENT THE PERSON’S INSTANCES OF COOPERATION WITH
IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT;
(2) RETAIN ALL RECORDS OF INSTANCES OF COOPERATION FOR NOT
FEWER THAN 5 YEARS AFTER EACH OCCURRENCE; AND
(3) NOTIFY ANY INDIVIDUAL WHOSE INFORMATION WAS SHARED,
INCLUDING, TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, WHAT INFORMATION WAS SHARED.
(C) (1) A PERSON HARMED BY A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST ANY PERSON THAT:
(I) VIOLATED THIS SECTION; OR
(II) AIDED ANOTHER IN COMMITTING A VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, A COURT MAY AWARD:
(I) ECONOMIC AND NONECONOMIC DAMAGES;
(II) DECLARATORY RELIEF;
(III) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; AND
(IV) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
3–2703.
(A) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY INVESTIGATE AN ALLEGED VIOLATION
OF THIS SUBTITLE BY:
(1) ISSUING SUBPOENAS;

HOUSE BILL 1536
(2) ADMINISTERING OATHS;
(3) COMPELLING THE ATTENDANCE AND TESTIMONY OF WITNESSES;
AND
(4) COMPELLING THE PRODUCTION OF RECORDS, BOOKS, PAPERS,
CONTRACTS, AND OTHER DOCUMENTS.
(B) A SUBPOENA ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE SERVED BY:
(1) CERTIFIED MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED;
(2) ANY ADULT WHO IS NOT A PARTY TO THE PROCEEDING; OR
(3) THE SHERIFF OR DEPUTY SHERIFF OF THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE
SUBPOENA IS ISSUED.
(C) IF A PERSON FAILS OR REFUSES TO COMPLY WITH A SUBPOENA, THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY APPLY TO A CIRCUIT COURT IN THE COUNTY IN WHICH
THE SUBPOENA WAS SERVED TO ENFORCE COMPLIANCE.
(D) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES THAT A VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE HAS OCCURRED, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL:
(1) PUBLISH:
(I) A SUMMARY OF THE ACTIVITY CONSTITUTING THE
VIOLATION;
(II) IF THE VIOLATION IS ONGOING OR LIKELY TO RECUR, THE
REMEDIAL MEASURES NECESSARY TO CORRECT THE VIOLATION OR PREVENT A
RECURRENCE OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(III) ANY OTHER RELEVANT INFORMATION; AND
(2) REFER THE MATTER TO:
(I) ANY LICENSING ENTITY THAT HOLDS AUTHORITY OVER A
LICENSE HELD BY THE VIOLATOR; AND
(II) FOR A MATTER THAT INVOLVES FEDERAL TORT CLAIMS,
THE FEDERAL DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE.

HOUSE BILL 1536 5
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL HAS REASON TO BELIEVE THAT A VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE HAS OCCURRED AND IS LIKELY TO RECUR, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY
BRING AN ACTION TO ENFORCE THIS SUBTITLE IN THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR ANY
COUNTY IN WHICH THE VIOLATION IS ALLEGED TO HAVE OCCURRED.
(2) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION ONLY AFTER:
1. CONDUCTING AN INVESTIGATION IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION;
2. AT LEAST 30 DAYS BEFORE BRINGING THE ACTION,
PROVIDING NOTICE TO THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE COUNTY WHERE THE
VIOLATION IS ALLEGED TO HAVE OCCURRED; AND
3. MAKING REASONABLE EFFORTS TO NOTIFY AN
ALLEGED VIOLATOR.
(II) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION TO
ENFORCE THIS SUBTITLE WITHOUT COMPLYING WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES THAT A DELAY POSES AN
IMMINENT AND SERIOUS THREAT TO LIFE, HEALTH, OR PUBLIC SAFETY.
(3) AS PART OF AN ACTION TO ENFORCE THIS SUBTITLE, THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN CERTIFICATION OF COMPLIANCE
WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) (I) IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE COURT MAY
AWARD:
1. ECONOMIC AND NONECONOMIC DAMAGES TO ANY
PERSON HARMED BY A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;
2. INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; AND
3. DECLARATIVE RELIEF.
(II) IN ADDITION TO ANY AWARD OF DAMAGES IMPOSED BY THE
COURT, A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY
NOT EXCEEDING $25,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION.

HOUSE BILL 1536
(III) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IS ENTITLED TO RECOVER THE
COSTS OF THE ACTION FOR THE USE OF THE STATE.
3–2704.
(A) IF A PERSON THAT HAS ENTERED INTO A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT
WITH THE STATE VIOLATES § 3–2702 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE BOARD OF PUBLIC
WORKS MAY:
(1) VOID THE PROCUREMENT CONTRACT;
(2) DECLINE TO RENEW THE PROCUREMENT AT EXPIRATION; OR
(3) IMPOSE CONDITIONS ON THE CONTINUATION OF THE
PROCUREMENT CONTRACT.
(B) ANY PROCUREMENT CONTRACT WITH THE STATE SHALL INCLUDE A
REQUIREMENT THAT THE PERSON ENTERING INTO THE PROCUREMENT CONTRACT:
(1) NOT VOLUNTARILY AID IN IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT IN
VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) RESPECT ALL RIGHTS OF OTHERS THAT ARE SECURED BY LAW.
3–2705.
(A) AN APPLICABLE LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY INSTITUTE A
DISCIPLINARY PROCEEDING AGAINST, AND MAY SUSPEND OR REVOKE THE
LICENSURE OF A LICENSEE, IF THE LICENSEE VIOLATES:
(1) § 3–2702 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(3) AN INDIVIDUAL’S RIGHTS SECURED BY THE MARYLAND
CONSTITUTION OR THE MARYLAND DECLARATION OF RIGHTS.
(B) A LICENSEE OR AN APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE SHALL, BEFORE A
LICENSE IS ISSUED OR RENEWED AND AS A PART OF THE APPLICABLE LICENSING
PROCEDURE, CERTIFY IN WRITING THAT THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE WILL
RESPECT ALL RIGHTS OF OTHERS THAT ARE SECURED BY LAW.

HOUSE BILL 1536 7
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.